Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.040

Federal cooperation program.

The department may take actions necessary to cooperate in implementation of the produce safety rule including, but not limited to, entering into cooperative agreements with the United States food and drug administration, conducting the compliance verification activities under RCW 15.135.060, enforcing regulatory compliance, and accepting federal funding to carry out such activities. The department may cooperate with the United States food and drug administration in implementation of the produce safety rule only to the extent that the department receives federal funding for such activities.

[ 2018 c 106 s 4.]